Utah statutes.
78B-6-1207.   Answer must set forth interests claimed.
(1)  All defendants shall set forth in their answers, fully and particularly,
the origin, nature, and extent of their respective interests in the property.
(2)  If a defendant claims a lien on the property by mortgage, judgment, or
otherwise, the defendant shall state the original amount and date of the
mortgage or judgment, and the amounts remaining unpaid.  The defendant shall
also state whether the mortgage or judgment has been secured in any other way,
and if secured, the extent and nature of the security.  If this information is
not provided, the defendant shall be considered to have waived any rights to
the lien.
